turku-src/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Vx-Ger
< "+Ger+Neg":[%$ д е] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-GerNeg ;
< "+Ger+Ant":[%$ м е к %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-GerAnt ; !Check that it is really ^E and not e.
< "+Ger+Ant":[%$ м е к] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" "@R.PXSG3.PRESENT@"> AfterVx-GerAnt ; 
< "+Ger+Post":[%$ м е ш к %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-GerPost ; !Check that it is really ^E and not e.
+Ger+Post:$меш AfterVx-GerPost-short ;
+Ger+Sim:$шын AfterVx-GerSim-syn ;
< "+Ger+Sim":[%$ ш %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" "@P.GERSIM.BEG@" >  AfterVx-GerSim-sy- ;  
< "+Ger+Sim":[%$ м %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" "@P.GERSIM.BEG@" >  AfterVx-GerSim-my- ;  

LEXICON Vx-GerInstr-je
+Ger+Instr:$ен WordEnd ;

LEXICON Vx-GerInstr-e
+Ger+Instr:$эн WordEnd ;

LEXICON Vx-GerInstr-y !Other altern. would be VEPn, but since there are
                                     !no vowel-final I conj. verb stems, the use of VEP 
                                     !has little motivation.
+Ger+Instr:$ын WordEnd ;

LEXICON Vx-GerInstr-0
+Ger+Instr:0 WordEnd ;

LEXICON Vx-GerSim-la
< "":[%$ л а] "@R.GERSIM.BEG@" "@P.GERSIM.END@" >  AfterVx-GerSim-la ;  

LEXICON Enc-ak  !Generally after any forms of nouns, (and verbs)
+Enc:$ак  AfterEnc-ak ;  !After ak the enclitic -la is attested 

LEXICON Enc-at  !Generally after any forms of nouns, (in verbs has the func. of conjunction)
+Enc:$ат  AfterEnc-at ; !After at the enclitic -laj is attested

LEXICON Enc-la  !Generally after anything; la and laj are different enclitics.
+Enc:$-ла  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON Enc-laj  !Generally after anything; la and laj are different eclitics.
+Enc:$-лай  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON Enc-ja_jan  !A continuation to this lexicon from Sg2 ja Pl2 imperatives;
                                 !ja occurs probably only in Sg2? jan attested in both Sg and Pl.
+Enc:$-я  WordEnd ; 
+Enc:$-ян  WordEnd ;
 
LEXICON Enc-ogyla !A continuation to this lexicon from AfterVxPers, i.e. not from Pret1.  
+Enc:$-огыла  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON Enc-mozho 
!A continuation to this lexicon from PxSg3 (vokaaliloppuiset) ; ala-moZo yms. 
! pronominitapaukset kokonaisina Root-leksikossa
< "+Enc":[%$ %- м о ж о]  "@R.PXSG3.PRESENT@" > WordEnd ; 

LEXICON Enc-mochet
< "+Enc":[%$ %- м о ч е т]  "@R.PXSG2.PRESENT@"  >  WordEnd ; 

!About Enc-s and Enc-ys: there are continuation to these lexicons from nominative nouns, 
!but not from other cases, as the only attested form in the Onchyko corpus is pajremys. 
!The other path to this lex. goes through the pers. endings of Pres and Pret2 (AfterVxPers).
!tevys (<tev^E) is also found, add therefore the required cont. later to the pronouns lexicon. 
!The present system makes (-)(y)s overproductive. Acc. to O.Sergeyev 2.05, (-)ys is used 
!after cons. and (-)s after vowels; however, net-s is found in the corpus. Perhaps the distrib-
!ution should be later defined by the phonological environment (the word ending in -C or -V).
!The vowel in (-)ys could be treated as an epenthetic vowel. A new insertion rule must be
!added or the former one reformulated, because the hyphen prevents the normal rule from
!working.
LEXICON Enc-s !distribution probably narrower
+Enc:$-с  WordEnd ; 
+Enc:$с  WordEnd ; !The orthographic dictionary gives -s and -ys without hyphen; triggers
                              !^E=>Y rule, e.g. tevys (tev^E+s).

LEXICON Enc-ys  !Mostly after the personal suffixes of verbs, but nouns also can have it
+Enc:$-ыс  WordEnd ;  
+Enc:$ыс  WordEnd ; !The orthographic dictionary gives -s and -ys without hyphen


!LEXICON SxNUnprod 
!$x WordEnd	;

!LEXICON SxNUndecl 
!$x WordEnd	;
